Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1530
Board; adopt reduction-in-force policy; contents.

Each board shall adopt a reduction-in-force policy covering employees subject to such statutory provisions to carry out the intent of sections 85-1530 to 85-1533. No such policy shall allow the reduction of a permanent or tenured employee while a probationary employee is retained to render a service which such permanent employee is qualified by reason of certification and endorsement to perform or, if certification is not applicable, by reason of college credits in the teaching area. If employee evaluation is to be included as a criterion to be used for reduction in force, specific criteria, such as frequency of evaluation, evaluation forms, and number and length of classroom observations shall be included as part of the reduction-in-force policy.

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 52.

This section does not apply to part-time employees. An educational institution does not need to literally attach evaluation forms to its reduction in force policy, so long as the policy sets forth specific criteria to be used in conducting evaluations. Ackerman v. Metropolitan Community College Area, 6 Neb. App. 536, 575 N.W.2d 181 (1998).